District of Columbia statutes.
8-1776.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “DDOE” means the District Department of the Environment.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1041, 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1041 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1041 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 1040 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle E of title I of the act may be cited as the “Smart Lighting Study Act of 2009”.

Short Title